Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.198

Emergency care, rescue, assistance, or recovery services in mine rescue or recovery work—Immunity from liability.

No person engaged in mine rescue or recovery work who, in good faith, renders emergency care, rescue, assistance, or recovery services at the scene of any emergency at or in a mine in this state or who employs, sponsors, or represents any person rendering emergency care, rescue, assistance, or recovery services shall be liable for any civil damages as a result of any act or omission by any person in rendering emergency care, rescue, assistance, or recovery service.

[ 1985 c 459 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 459: See note following RCW 79.14.510.